Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 2. State and Local Administration of Weight and Measure Regulation.

Sec. 45.75.030.
State director and inspectors of weights and measures.

The commissioner of transportation and public facilities is ex officio state director of weights and measures. The director may appoint state inspectors.

History.

(§ 7 ch 101 SLA 1961; am E.O. No. 98 § 10 (1997))

Collateral references. —

94 C.J.S., Weights and Measures, § 9.

Sec. 45.75.040.
General powers and duties of director.

The director is the custodian of the state standards of weight and measure and of the other standards and equipment provided for by this chapter. The director shall keep accurate records of the standards and equipment.
The director shall enforce this chapter.
The director shall supervise the weights and measures offered for sale, sold, or in use in the state.

History.

(§ 8 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Administrative Code. —

For testing equipment, see 17 AAC 90, art. 1.

For disposition of incorrect apparatus, see 17 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electric meters, see 17 AAC 90, art. 3.

For commodities, see 17 AAC 90, art. 4.

For registered service providers, see 17 AAC 90, art. 5.

For national type evaluation program (NTEP), see 17 AAC 90, art. 6.

For appeals, see 17 AAC 90, art. 7.

For metrology laboratory fee for service, see 17 AAC 90, art. 8.

For weighing and measuring device registration and fees, see 17 AAC 90, art. 9.

For definitions, see 17 AAC 90, art. 10.

Sec. 45.75.050.
Adoption of regulations.

The director shall adopt regulations for the enforcement of this chapter under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). These have the effect of law.

The regulations may include

standards of net weight, measure, or count, and reasonable standards of fill, for a commodity in package form;

rules governing the technical and reporting procedures to be followed, and the report and record forms and marks of approval and rejection to be used by inspectors of weights and measures in the discharge of their official duties;

exemptions from the sealing or marking requirements of AS

45.75.120

for weights and measures of a character or size that sealing or marking would be inappropriate, impracticable, or damaging to the apparatus in question;

for classes of weights and measures of a character that retesting is unnecessary to continued accuracy, exemptions from the requirements of AS

45.75.070

and

45.75.080

for testing, and schedules fixing the frequency of required retests for classes of devices exempted; and

in the implementation of AS

19.10.060(b)

, provisions governing the size, weight, and load limitations established under AS

19.10.060

; the issuance of permits for overweight and oversize vehicles; and the operation of weigh stations.

The regulations must include specifications, tolerance, and regulations for weights and measures of the character of those specified in AS

45.75.080

, designed to eliminate from use, without prejudice to apparatus that conforms as closely as practicable to the official standards, those that

are not accurate;

are of such construction that they are not reasonably permanent in their adjustment or will not repeat their indications correctly; or

facilitate the perpetration of fraud.

The specifications, tolerances, and regulations for commercial weighing and measuring devices, together with amendments to them, as recommended by the National Bureau of Standards or its successor organization, the National Institute of Standards and Technology, and published in the National Bureau of Standards or its successor organization, the National Institute of Standards and Technology, Handbook 44 and supplements to it, or in any publication revising or superseding Handbook 44, are the specifications, tolerances, and regulations for commercial weighing and measuring devices of the state, except as specifically modified, amended, or rejected by a regulation adopted by the director.

For the purposes of this chapter, apparatus is correct when it conforms to the requirements adopted in accordance with this section; other apparatus is considered incorrect.

The director shall adopt regulations establishing reasonable fees for testing, inspection, and other services provided under this chapter, and procedures for collecting the fees.

History.

(§ 9 ch 101 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1987; am § 54 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 73 ch 36 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 98 § 11 (1997))

Revisor’s notes. —

Two occurrences of the word “annual” were deleted from (b)(4) of this section in 1986 to correct a manifest error in the original enactment.

Administrative Code. —

For division of measurement standards, see 17 AAC 90.

For commercial motor vehicles: size and weight, see 17 AAC 25, art. 1.

For oversize and overweight vehicles, see 17 AAC 25, art. 3.

For waivers, see 17 AAC 25, art. 4.

For testing equipment, see 17 AAC 90, art. 1.

For disposition of incorrect apparatus, see 17 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electric meters, see 17 AAC 90, art. 3.

For commodities, see 17 AAC 90, art. 4.

For registered service providers, see 17 AAC 90, art. 5.

For national type evaluation program (NTEP), see 17 AAC 90, art. 6.

For appeals, see 17 AAC 90, art. 7.

For metrology laboratory fee for service, see 17 AAC 90, art. 8.

For weighing and measuring device registration and fees, see 17 AAC 90, art. 9.

For definitions, see 17 AAC 90, art. 10.

Sec. 45.75.060.
Office and working standards and equipment.

The state shall supply the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities with a duplicate set of state standards of weight and measure, referred to in this chapter as office standards. The state shall supply field standards and the equipment that is necessary to carry out this chapter. The office standards and field standards shall be verified upon their initial receipt and at least once each year afterward. The office standards shall be verified by direct comparison with the state standards. The field standards shall be verified by comparison with the office standards.

History.

(§ 6 ch 101 SLA 1961; am E.O. No. 98 § 12 (1997))

Sec. 45.75.070.
Testing and inspection of local standards and weights and measures at state-supported institutions.

At least once every five years, the director shall test the standards of weight and measure obtained by a city that has appointed a sealer of weights and measures, and shall approve them if they are correct. The director shall inspect the standards at least once every two years.

The director shall from time to time test all weights and measures used in checking the receipt or disbursement of supplies in every institution maintained by money appropriated by the legislature, and shall report the findings, in writing, to the supervisory board and to the executive officer of the institution concerned.

History.

(§ 10 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Administrative Code. —

For testing equipment, see 17 AAC 90, art. 1.

For disposition of incorrect apparatus, see 17 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electric meters, see 17 AAC 90, art. 3.

For commodities, see 17 AAC 90, art. 4.

For registered service providers, see 17 AAC 90, art. 5.

For national type evaluation program (NTEP), see 17 AAC 90, art. 6.

For appeals, see 17 AAC 90, art. 7.

For metrology laboratory fee for service, see 17 AAC 90, art. 8.

For weighing and measuring device registration and fees, see 17 AAC 90, art. 9.

For definitions, see 17 AAC 90, art. 10.

Collateral references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d, Weights and Measures, § 17.

Sec. 45.75.080.
General testing.

The director may inspect and test, to ascertain if they are correct, all weights and measures kept, offered, or exposed for sale. The director shall, at least annually and more often as considered necessary, inspect and test, to ascertain if they are correct, all weights and measures commercially used in

determining the weight, measurement, or count of commodities or things sold, or offered or exposed for sale, on the basis of weight or of measure;

computing the basic charge or payment for services rendered on the basis of weight or of measure or count; or

determining weight or measurement when a charge is made for this determination.

However, in the case of single-service devices, that is, devices designed to be used commercially only once and to be then discarded, and in the case of devices uniformly mass-produced, as by means of a mold or die, and not susceptible of individual adjustment, the inspection and testing of each individual device is not required and the inspecting and testing requirements of this section are satisfied when inspections and tests are made on representative samples of the devices. The lots from which representative samples are inspected and tested are held correct or incorrect upon the basis of the results of the inspections and tests on the samples.

History.

(§ 11 ch 101 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For testing equipment, see 17 AAC 90, art. 1.

For disposition of incorrect apparatus, see 17 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electric meters, see 17 AAC 90, art. 3.

For commodities, see 17 AAC 90, art. 4.

For registered service providers, see 17 AAC 90, art. 5.

For national type evaluation program (NTEP), see 17 AAC 90, art. 6.

For appeals, see 17 AAC 90, art. 7.

For metrology laboratory fee for service, see 17 AAC 90, art. 8.

For weighing and measuring device registration and fees, see 17 AAC 90, art. 9.

For definitions, see 17 AAC 90, art. 10.

Sec. 45.75.090.
Investigations.

The director shall investigate complaints of violations of this chapter, and shall initiate and conduct the investigations that the director considers appropriate and advisable to develop information on prevailing procedures in commercial quantity determination and on possible violations of this chapter and to promote the general objective of accuracy in the determination and representation of quantity in commercial transactions.

History.

(§ 12 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Administrative Code. —

For testing equipment, see 17 AAC 90, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d, Weights and Measures, § 10 et seq.

Sec. 45.75.100.
Inspection of packages.

The director shall, from time to time, weigh or measure and inspect packages or amounts of commodities kept, offered, or exposed for sale to determine whether they contain the amounts represented and whether they are kept, offered, or exposed for sale in accordance with law. When packages or amounts of commodities do not contain the amounts represented, or are kept, offered, or exposed for sale in violation of law, the director may order them off sale and may mark or tag them to show they are illegal. The director may use recognized sampling procedures. Compliance of a given lot of packages shall be determined on the basis of the result obtained on a sample selected from and representative of the lot.

A person may not

sell, or keep, offer, or expose for sale in intrastate commerce a package or amount of commodity that has been ordered off sale or marked or tagged as provided in this section until the package or amount of commodity has been brought into full compliance with all legal requirements; or

dispose of a package or amount of commodity that is ordered off sale or marked or tagged as provided in this section and that does not meet legal requirements, except with the specific approval of the director.

History.

(§ 13 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Sec. 45.75.110.
Stop-use, stop-removal, and removal orders.

The director may issue stop-use orders, stop-removal orders, and removal orders for weights and measures used or capable of being used commercially. The director may issue stop-removal orders and removal orders for packages or amounts of commodities kept, offered, or exposed for sale whenever the director considers it necessary or expedient in enforcing this chapter.

A person may not use, remove from the premises specified, or fail to remove from the premises specified a weight, measure, or package or amount of commodity contrary to a stop-use order, stop-removal order, or removal order issued under this section.

History.

(§ 14 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Administrative Code. —

For disposition of incorrect apparatus, see 17 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electric meters, see 17 AAC 90, art. 3.

For commodities, see 17 AAC 90, art. 4.

Sec. 45.75.120.
Disposition of correct and incorrect apparatus.

The director shall approve for use and seal or mark with appropriate devices the weights and measures that the director finds upon inspection and test to be correct as provided in AS

45.75.050

, and shall reject and mark or tag as “rejected” the weights and measures that the director finds, upon inspection or test, to be incorrect as provided in AS

45.75.050

but which in the director’s best judgment are susceptible of satisfactory repair. This sealing or marking is not required for weights and measures exempted by regulation of the director.

The director shall condemn, and may seize and destroy weights and measures found to be incorrect that, in the director’s best judgment, are not susceptible of satisfactory repair. Weights and measures that are rejected may be confiscated and destroyed by the director if not corrected as required by AS

45.75.180

or if used or disposed of contrary to the requirements of AS

45.75.180

.

History.

(§ 15 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Administrative Code. —

For disposition of incorrect apparatus, see 17 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electric meters, see 17 AAC 90, art. 3.

For commodities, see 17 AAC 90, art. 4.

Sec. 45.75.130.
Police powers and right of entry and stoppage.

In the enforcement of this chapter and any other law dealing with weights and measures the director has special police powers.
The director may arrest, without formal warrant, any person violating the law, and seize for use as evidence, without formal warrant, incorrect or unsealed weights and measures or amounts or packages of commodity, used, retained, offered or exposed for sale, or sold in violation of law.
In performing the director’s duties, the director may enter, without formal warrant, any structure or premises, and stop any person and require the person to proceed to a specified place.

History.

(§ 16 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Sec. 45.75.131.
Issuance of citations.

A peace officer or an employee of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities who is authorized by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities to enforce this chapter may issue a citation to a person who

violates a weight, size, or load limitation adopted by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS

19.10.060

;

violates the terms of an overweight or oversize vehicle permit issued under AS

19.10.060(b)

;

violates a regulation adopted under AS

19.10.060(b)

or (c), AS

28.05.011(a)(2)

, or AS

45.75.050(b)(5)

; or

commits a violation identified under AS

45.75.380

.

A citation issued under this section must comply with the standards adopted under AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

. A person receiving the citation is not required to sign a promise to appear in court.

The time specified in the notice to appear on a citation issued under this section must be at least five working days after the issuance of the citation.

The commissioner of public safety is responsible for the issuance of books containing appropriate citations and shall maintain a record of each book and each citation contained in it. The commissioner of public safety shall require and retain a receipt for every book issued to an employee of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities designated by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities to provide investigative services to enforce provisions of this chapter.

On or before the 10th working day after issuance, a peace officer or an employee who issues a citation under this section shall deposit the original or a copy of the citation with a court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense. Upon its deposit with the court, the citation may be disposed of only by trial in the court or other official action taken by the magistrate, judge, or prosecutor. The peace officer or employee who issued the citation may not dispose of it or copies of it or of the record of its issuance except as required under this subsection and (f) of this section.

The commissioner of public safety shall require the return of a copy of every citation issued under this section and of all copies of every citation that has been spoiled or on which an entry has been made and not issued to an alleged violator. The commissioner of public safety shall also maintain in connection with every citation issued a record of the disposition of the charge by the court in which the original or copy of the citation was deposited.

A citation issued under this section is considered to be a lawful complaint for the purpose of prosecution.

Unless the citation has been voided or otherwise dismissed by the magistrate, judge, or prosecutor, or bail has been forfeited under AS

45.75.133

, a person who fails to appear in court to answer a citation issued under this section, regardless of the disposition of the charge for which the citation was issued, is guilty of failure to obey a citation under AS

12.25.230(b)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 85 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 15 SLA 1994; am E.O. No. 98 §§ 13, 14 (1997); am E.O. No. 99 § 72 (1997); am § 19 ch 48 SLA 1998; am §§ 50 — 54 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For commercial motor vehicles: safety and hazardous materials, see 17 AAC 25, art. 2.

For oversize and overweight vehicles, see 17 AAC 25, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (b) substituted “comply with the standards adopted under AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

” for “be in writing”; in (c), substituted “five working days” for “15 days”, and deleted “, unless the person cited requests an earlier hearing” at the end of the subsection; in (e), added “On or before the 10th working day after issuance” at the beginning; rewrote (g); in (h), substituted “failure to obey a citation under AS

12.25.230

(b)” for “a class B misdemeanor”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (b), (c), (e), (g), and (h) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 45.75.133.
Bail forfeiture.

The supreme court shall specify by rule or order those violations that are appropriate for disposition without court appearance, and shall establish a schedule of bail amounts. The maximum bail forfeiture amount for an offense may not exceed the maximum fine specified by law for that offense. If the person who has been cited can dispose of the violation without court appearance, the issuing peace officer or employee shall write on the citation the amount of bail forfeiture applicable to the violation.

If a person cited for a violation for which a bail forfeiture amount has been established under (a) of this section does not contest the citation, the person may, within 30 days after the date of the citation, mail or personally deliver to the clerk of the court in which the citation is filed by the employee

the amount of bail indicated on the citation for that offense; and

a copy of the citation indicating that the right to an appearance is waived, a plea of no contest is entered, and the bail is forfeited.

When the cited person has forfeited bail under (b) of this section, the court shall enter a judgment of conviction. Forfeiture of bail is a complete satisfaction for the violation. The clerk of the court accepting the bail forfeiture shall provide the offender with a receipt stating that fact if requested.

A person cited under this section is guilty of failure to obey a citation under AS

12.25.230(b)

if the person fails to pay the bail amount established under (a) of this section or fails to appear in court as required.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, if a person cited for a violation for which a bail forfeiture amount has been established under (a) of this section appears in court and is found guilty, the court may not impose a penalty that exceeds the bail forfeiture amount for that offense established under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 85 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 25 SLA 1995; am §§ 55, 56 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For oversize vehicle bail schedule, see Alaska Court Rule of Administration 43.6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (b), substituted “If a” for “A”, added “does not contest the citation, the person” following “(a) of this section”, and substituted “within 30 days” for “within 15 days”; rewrote (d).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (b) and (d) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 45.75.140.
Powers and duties of deputy director and inspector.

The powers and duties of the director specified in AS

45.75.070

—

45.75.130

,

45.75.170

, and

45.75.380

shall also be exercised by the deputy director and inspectors, when acting under the instructions and at the direction of the director.

History.

(§ 17 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Revisor’s notes. —

“AS

45.75.070

—

45.75.130

” was substituted for “AS

45.75.070

,

45.75.130

” in 1990 to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 45.75.150.
Appointment of city sealers and deputy sealers of weights and measures.

A city may appoint a sealer of weights and measures, and the deputy sealers of weights and measures it needs. If the city appoints a sealer, it shall obtain at its expense the standards of weights and measures and the additional equipment, for use in the enforcement of this chapter in the city, that the director prescribes.

When the standards of weight and measure provided by a city are examined and approved by the director, they are the official standards for the city. At least every five years, the sealer shall make or arrange to have made comparisons between the field standards and appropriate standards of a higher order belonging to the city or to the state, in order to maintain the field standards in accurate condition.

History.

(§ 18 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Collateral references. —

94 C.J.S., Weights and Measures, §§ 13, 16 et seq.

Sec. 45.75.160.
City sealers and deputy sealers.

The sealer of a city, and a deputy sealer when acting under the instructions and direction of the sealer, have the same powers and shall perform the same duties within the city as those granted to and imposed upon the director by AS

45.75.080

—

45.75.130

and

45.75.380

.

History.

(§ 19 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Sec. 45.75.170.
Concurrent jurisdiction.

In each city having a sealer of weights and measures, the director has concurrent authority to enforce this chapter.

History.

(§ 20 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Sec. 45.75.180.
Duty of owners of incorrect apparatus.

Weights and measures rejected by the director or a sealer remain subject to the control of the rejecting authority until suitable repair or disposition of them is made as required by this section.
The owner of a rejected weight and measure shall correct it within 30 days or a longer period authorized by the rejecting authority; or, may dispose of it in the manner authorized by the rejecting authority.
Rejected weights and measures may not again be used commercially until officially re-examined and found to be correct or until specific written permission for their use is issued by the rejecting authority.

History.

(§ 21 ch 101 SLA 1961)

Administrative Code. —

For electric meters, see 17 AAC 90, art. 3.